California, session 20252026, AB2539.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 12012.25 of the Government Code is amended to read:12012.25. (a) The following tribal-state gaming compacts entered into in accordance with the Indian Gaming Regulatory Act of 1988 (18 U.S.C. Sec. 1166 to 1168, incl., and 25 U.S.C. Sec. 2701 et seq.) are hereby ratified:(1) The compact between the State of California and the Alturas Rancheria, executed on September 10, 1999.(2) The compact between the State of California and the Barona Band of Mission Indians, executed on September 10, 1999.(3) The compact between the State of California and the Big Sandy Rancheria Band of Mono Indians, executed on September 10, 1999.(4) The compact between the State of California and the Big Valley Rancheria, executed on September 10, 1999.(5) The compact between the State of California and the Bishop Paiute Tribe, executed on September 10, 1999.(6) The compact between the State of California and the Blue Lake Rancheria, executed on September 10, 1999.(7) The compact between the State of California and the Buena Vista Band of Me-wuk Indians, executed on September 10, 1999.(8) The compact between the State of California and the Cabazon Band of Mission Indians, executed on September 10, 1999.(9) The compact between the State of California and the Cahto Tribe of Laytonville, executed on September 10, 1999.(10) The compact between the State of California and the Cahuilla Band of Mission Indians, executed on September 10, 1999.(11) The compact between the State of California and the Campo Band of Mission Indians, executed on September 10, 1999.(12) The compact between the State of California and the Chemehuevi Indian Tribe, executed on September 10, 1999.(13) The compact between the State of California and the Chicken Ranch Rancheria, executed on September 10, 1999.(14) The compact between the State of California and the Coast Indian Community of the Resighini Rancheria, executed on September 10, 1999.(15) The compact between the State of California and the Colusa Indian Community, executed on September 10, 1999.(16) The compact between the State of California and the Dry Creek Rancheria Band of Pomo Indians, executed on September 10, 1999.(17) The compact between the State of California and the Elk Valley Rancheria, executed on September 10, 1999.(18) The compact between the State of California and the Ewiiaapaayp Band of Kumeyaay, executed on September 10, 1999.(19) The compact between the State of California and the Hoopa Valley Tribe, executed on September 10, 1999.(20) The compact between the State of California and the Hopland Band of Pomo Indians, executed on September 10, 1999.(21) The compact between the State of California and the Jackson Band of Mi-Wuk Indians, executed on September 10, 1999.(22) The compact between the State of California and the Jamul Indian Reservation, executed on September 10, 1999.(23) The compact between the State of California and the La Jolla Indian Reservation, executed on September 10, 1999.(24) The compact between the State of California and the Manzanita Tribe of Kumeyaay Indians, executed on September 10, 1999.(25) The compact between the State of California and the Mesa Grande Band of Mission Indians, executed on September 10, 1999.(26) The compact between the State of California and the Middletown Rancheria Band of Pomo Indians, executed on September 10, 1999.(27) The compact between the State of California and the Morongo Band of Mission Indians, executed on September 10, 1999.(28) The compact between the State of California and the Mooretown Rancheria Concow Maidu Tribe, executed on September 10, 1999.(29) The compact between the State of California and the Pala Band of Mission Indians, executed on September 10, 1999.(30) The compact between the State of California and the Paskenta Band of Nomlaki Indians, executed on September 10, 1999.(31) The compact between the State of California and the Pechanga Band of Luiseno Indians, executed on September 10, 1999.(32) The compact between the State of California and the Picayune Rancheria of Chukchansi Indians, executed on September 10, 1999.(33) The compact between the State of California and the Quechan Nation, executed on September 10, 1999.(34) The compact between the State of California and the Redding Rancheria, executed on September 10, 1999.(35) The compact between the State of California and the Rincon, San Luiseno Band of Mission Indians, executed on September 10, 1999.(36) The compact between the State of California and the Rumsey Band of Wintun Indians, executed on September 10, 1999.(37) The compact between the State of California and the Robinson Rancheria Band of Pomo Indians, executed on September 10, 1999.(38) The compact between the State of California and the Rohnerville Rancheria, executed on September 10, 1999.(39) The compact between the State of California and the San Manuel Band of Mission Indians, executed on September 10, 1999.(40) The compact between the State of California and the San Pasqual Band of Mission Indians, executed on September 10, 1999.(41) The compact between the State of California and the Santa Rosa Rancheria Tachi Tribe, executed on September 10, 1999.(42) The compact between the State of California and the Santa Ynez Band of Chumash Indians, executed on September 10, 1999.(43) The compact between the State of California and the Sherwood Valley Rancheria Band of Pomo Indians, executed on September 10, 1999.(44) The compact between the State of California and the Shingle Springs Band of Miwok Indians, executed on September 10, 1999.(45) The compact between the State of California and the Smith River Rancheria, executed on September 10, 1999.(46) The compact between the State of California and the Soboba Band of Mission Indians, executed on September 10, 1999.(47) The compact between the State of California and the Susanville Indian Rancheria, executed on September 10, 1999.(48) The compact between the State of California and the Sycuan Band of Kumeyaay Indians, executed on September 10, 1999.(49) The compact between the State of California and the Table Mountain Rancheria, executed on September 10, 1999.(50) The compact between the State of California and the Trinidad Rancheria, executed on September 10, 1999.(51) The compact between the State of California and the Tule River Indian Tribe, executed on September 10, 1999.(52) The compact between the State of California and the Tuolumne Band of Me-wuk Indians, executed on September 10, 1999.(53) The compact between the State of California and the Twenty-Nine Palms Band of Mission Indians, executed on September 10, 1999.(54) The compact between the State of California and the Tyme Maidu Tribe, Berry Creek Rancheria, executed on September 10, 1999.(55) The compact between the State of California and the United Auburn Indian Community, executed on September 10, 1999.(56) The compact between the State of California and the Viejas Band of Kumeyaay Indians, executed on September 10, 1999.(57) The compact between the State of California and the Coyote Valley Band of Pomo Indians, executed on September 10, 1999.(b) Any other tribal-state gaming compact entered into between the State of California and a federally recognized Indian tribe which that is executed after September 10, 1999, is hereby ratified if both of the following are true:(1) The compact is identical in all material respects to any of the compacts expressly ratified pursuant to subdivision (a). A compact shall be deemed to be materially identified identical to a compact ratified pursuant to subdivision (a) if the Governor certifies it is materially identical at the time the Governor submits it to the Legislature.(2) The compact is not rejected by each house of the Legislature, two-thirds of the membership thereof concurring, within 30 days of the date of the submission of the compact to the Legislature by the Governor. However, if the 30-day period ends during a joint recess of the Legislature, the period shall be extended until the fifteenth 20th day following the day on which that the Legislature reconvenes.(c) The Legislature acknowledges the right of federally recognized Indian tribes to exercise their sovereignty to negotiate and enter into tribal-state gaming compacts that are materially different from the compacts ratified pursuant to subdivision (a). These compacts shall be ratified by a statute approved by each house of the Legislature, a majority of the members thereof concurring, and signed by the Governor, unless the statute contains implementing or other provisions requiring a supermajority vote, in which case the statute shall be approved in the manner required by the Constitution.(d) The Governor is the designated state officer responsible for negotiating and executing, on behalf of the state, tribal-state gaming compacts with federally recognized Indian tribes located within the State of California pursuant to the federal Indian Gaming Regulatory Act of 1988 (18 U.S.C. Sec. 1166 to 1168, incl., and 25 U.S.C. Sec. 2701 et seq.) for the purpose of authorizing class III gaming, as defined in that act, on Indian lands within this state. Nothing in this section shall This section shall not be construed to deny the existence of the Governor’s authority to have negotiated and executed tribal-state gaming compacts prior to before the effective date of this section.(e) Following completion of negotiations conducted pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c), the Governor shall submit a copy of an executed tribal-state compact to both houses of the Legislature for ratification, and shall submit a copy of the executed compact to the Secretary of State for purposes of subdivision (f).(f) Upon receipt of a statute ratifying a tribal-state compact negotiated and executed pursuant to subdivision (c), or upon the expiration of the review period described in subdivision (b), the Secretary of State shall forward a copy of the executed compact and the ratifying statute, if applicable, to the Secretary of the Interior for the Secretary’s review and approval, in accordance with paragraph (8) of subsection (d) of Section 2710 of Title 25 of the United States Code.(g) In deference to tribal sovereignty, neither the execution of a tribal-state gaming compact nor the on-reservation impacts of compliance with the terms of a tribal-state gaming compact shall be deemed to constitute a project for purposes of the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code).